Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 20. Miscellaneous Offenses.

§ 62.1-194.
Casting garbage, etc., into waters.

Except as otherwise permitted by law, it shall be unlawful for any person to cast, throw or dump any garbage, refuse, dead animal, trash, carton, can, bottle, container, box, lumber, timber or like material, or other solid waste, except fish or crab bait in any form, into any of the waters of this Commonwealth. When a violation of any provision of this section has been observed by any person, and the matter dumped or disposed of in the waters of this Commonwealth has been ejected from a boat, the owner or operator of such boat shall be presumed to be the person ejecting such matter; provided, however, that such presumption shall be rebuttable by competent evidence. Every such act shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $1,000 or confinement in jail not to exceed thirty days, or both. Every law-enforcement officer of this Commonwealth and its subdivisions shall have authority to enforce the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 62-182, 62-183; 1960, c. 246; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 486; 1974, c. 603; 2007, c. 24.

Cross references.

As to arrests for violation of this chapter, with or without warrants, see §

28.2-900

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 24 substituted “$1,000” for “$100” in the third sentence.

Law Review.

For article on problems of water resource management in Virginia, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 388 (1971).

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Animals, § 13; 12A M.J. Logs and Logging, § 3.

§ 62.1-194.1.
Obstructing or contaminating state waters.

Except as otherwise permitted by law, it shall be unlawful for any person to dump, place or put, or cause to be dumped, placed or put into, upon the banks of or into the channels of any state waters any object or substance, noxious or otherwise, which may reasonably be expected to endanger, obstruct, impede, contaminate or substantially impair the lawful use or enjoyment of such waters and their environs by others. Any person who violates any provision of this law shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each day that any of said materials or substances so dumped, placed or put, or caused to be dumped, placed or put into, upon the banks of or into the channels of, said streams shall constitute a separate offense and be punished as such.

In addition to the foregoing penalties for violation of this law, the judge of the circuit court of the locality wherein any such violation occurs, whether there be a criminal conviction therefor or not shall, upon a complaint filed by the attorney of such locality or by any person whose property is damaged or whose property is threatened with damage from any such violation, award an injunction enjoining any violation of this law by any person found by the court in such suit to have violated this law or causing the same to be violated, when made a party defendant to such suit.

History.

1968, c. 659; 2007, c. 26.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 26 inserted the subsection designators; in subsection A, substituted “shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor” for “shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction be punished by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 or by confinement in jail not more than twelve months or both such fine and imprisonment”; and in subsection B, substituted “circuit court of the locality wherein any such violation occurs, whether there be a criminal conviction therefor or not shall, upon a complaint filed by the attorney of such locality” for “circuit court of the county or corporation court of the city wherein any such violation occurs, whether there be a criminal conviction therefor or not shall, upon a bill in equity, filed by the attorney for the Commonwealth of such county.”

Law Review.

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

§ 62.1-194.1:1.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to fisheries and habitat of the tidal waters, see §

28.2-100

et seq.

§ 62.1-194.2.
Throwing trash, etc., into or obstructing river, creek, stream or swamp.

It shall be unlawful for any person to throw or otherwise dispose of trash, debris, tree laps, logs, or fell timber or make or cause to be made any obstruction which exists for more than a week (excepting a lawfully constructed dam) in, under, over or across any river, creek, stream, or swamp, so as to obstruct the free passage of boats, canoes, or other floating vessels, or fish in such waters. The provisions of this section shall be enforceable by duly authorized state and local law-enforcement officials and by conservation police officers whose general police power under §

29.1-205

and forest wardens whose general police powers under § 10.1-1135 shall be deemed to include enforcement of the provisions of this section. Violations of this section shall be punishable as a misdemeanor under §

18.2-12

; and each day for which any violation continues without removal of such obstruction, on and after the tenth day following service of process on the violator in accordance with §

19.2-75

, shall constitute a separate offense punishable as a misdemeanor under §

18.2-12

.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-187.1; 1964, c. 157; 1968, c. 86; 1988, c. 196.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the original number having been 62-187.1.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “conservation police officers” was substituted for “game wardens” to conform to the name change by Acts 2007, c. 87.

Law Review.

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

§ 62.1-194.3.
Obstructing tributaries of Big Sandy River; dumping refuse, etc., into Big Sandy River or its tributaries.

If any person place any dam or other obstruction in any tributary of Big Sandy River so as to prevent the free passage of timber, or any raft or boat, he shall be fined not less than $50 nor more than $500; and, upon conviction thereof, the court or judge of the county court shall order the dam or other obstruction to be removed at his expense.

It shall also be unlawful for any person to dump, place or put, or cause to be dumped, placed, or put into, upon the banks of or into the channels of Big Sandy River or any of its tributaries, any dirt, stone, coal, slate, cinders, mine refuse, trees, timber, logs, garbage or any other material or substance so as to in anywise narrow, fill or restrict or partially narrow, fill or restrict the channels of said streams or impede the natural flow of the waters of said river or any of its tributaries or dump, place or put, or cause to be dumped, placed or put any dirt, stone, coal, slate, cinders, mine refuse, trees, timber, logs, garbage or any other material, or substance where the same does by natural rainfall or flow of water become washed or otherwise carried into, upon the banks of, or into the channels of, such river or any of its tributaries so as to in anywise narrow, fill or restrict or partially narrow, fill or restrict the channels of any of said streams or impede the natural flow of the waters thereof. Any person who violates any provision of this law shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction be punished by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 or by confinement in jail not more than twelve months or both such fine and imprisonment. Each day that any of said materials or substances so dumped, placed or put, or caused to be dumped, placed or put into or so allowed to be washed or otherwise so carried into, upon the banks of or into the channels of, said streams shall constitute a separate offense and be punished as such.

In addition to the foregoing penalties for violation of this law, the judge of the circuit court of the county wherein any such violation occurs, whether there be a criminal conviction therefor or not shall, upon a bill in equity, filed by the attorney for the Commonwealth of such county or by any person whose property is damaged or whose property is threatened with damage from any such violation, award an injunction enjoining any violation of this law by any person found by the court in such suit to have violated this law or causing the same to be violated, when made a party defendant to such suit.

This section shall not be construed to restrict the construction or reconstruction of highways, or the construction or reconstruction of the right-of-way of any company subject to the Commonwealth Corporation Commission, or the maintenance thereof in either case, provided the channel thereafter continues to permit a flow of water in such stream at least as large as that prevailing theretofore, provided that if the channel above the point of such work be widened or deepened subsequently then such company may be required by the circuit court of the county on petition of any interested person to change its right-of-way where practicable so as to permit the increased flow of water.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-190; 1960, c. 257; 1968, c. 169.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the original number having been 62-190.

§ 62.1-195.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 917.

Cross references.

As to present provisions relating to discharge of oil into waters, see §§

62.1-44.34:14

through

62.1-44.34:23

.

§ 62.1-195.1.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For this section as effective October 1, 2021, see §§

45.2-1645

and

45.2-1646

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, amended this section effective October 1, 2021. The amendment was given effect in §

45.2-1645

at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Former §

62.1-195.1

, pertaining to prohibition of drilling for oil or gas in the Chesapeake Bay, derived from Acts 1989, c. 325; 1990, c. 967; 1992, cc. 480, 887; 1993, c. 239; 1994, c. 957; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

§ 62.1-195.2.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1990, c. 314, and expired by its own terms July 1, 1992.

§ 62.1-195.3.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For this section as effective October 1, 2021, see §

45.2-1647

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

62.1-195.3

, pertaining to hydraulic fracturing and groundwater management area, derived from 2020, c. 626.

§ 62.1-196.
Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

For current requirement that a life preserver be provided for boat rental, see §

29.1-736

.